District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.61

Submission of statement of impact of proposed acts on taxpayers.

The Mayor shall submit to the Council of the District of Columbia, simultaneously with any proposed revenue measure or proposed act, a detailed statement with supporting data concerning the direct and indirect impact of the measure or bill upon those taxpayers who will be directly or indirectly affected by the measure or act.

History

Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-124, title IX, § 902, 23 DCR 8749

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-243.
1973 Ed., § 1-162a.